Utah statutes.
48-2c-702.   Initial members.

(1)  In connection with the formation of a company, a person becomes a member of the company upon the earliest to occur of the following:

(a)  when the person signs the articles of organization as a member;

(b)  when the person signs the operating agreement as a member; or

(c)  when:

(i)  the person evidences the intent to become a member, either orally, in writing, or by other action such as transferring property or paying money to the company for an interest in the company; and

(ii)  the person's admission as a member is reflected in the records of the company or is otherwise acknowledged by the company.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a person may not become a member of a company prior to formation of the company.

